Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5 INDEBTEDNESS AND FINANCIAL PROVISIONS
32-11-550. Rejection of bids.

If a bid is accepted, the deposits of all other bidders shall be thereupon returned. If all bids are rejected, all deposits shall be returned forthwith.

If the successful bidder fails or neglects to complete the purchase of the securities within thirty days following the acceptance of his bid, or within ten days after the bonds are made ready and are tendered by the district for delivery, whichever is later, the amount of his deposit shall be forfeited to the district (but no bidder shall forfeit such deposit whenever the securities are not ready and so tendered for delivery within sixty days from the date of the acceptance of his bid), and the board may accept the bid of the person making the next best bid.

If all bids are rejected, the board may readvertise the securities for sale in the same manner as provided for the original advertisement or may sell the securities privately.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 776, § 92.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-92.

32-11-551. Bond maturities.

General obligation bonds shall mature within not exceeding forty years from their date or respective dates and commencing not later than the third year thereafter, in such manner as the board may determine.

Special obligation bonds (other than assessment bonds) shall mature within not exceeding fifty years from their date or respective dates.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 776, § 93.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-93.

32-11-552. Prior redemption provisions.

The board may provide for the redemption prior to maturity at the option of the district of any or all of the bonds or other district securities designated in section 32-11-501 (2), in such order, by lot or otherwise, at such time, with or without the payment of such premiums not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount of each bond or other security so redeemed, and otherwise upon such terms as may be provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the securities or other instrument pertaining thereto.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 777, § 94.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-94.

32-11-553. Special funds and accounts.

The board, in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or other securities designated in section 32-11-501 (2) or in any instrument or other proceedings pertaining thereto, may create special funds and accounts for the payment of the cost of a project, of operation and maintenance expenses, of the securities, including the accumulation and maintenance of reserves therefor, of improvements, including the accumulation and maintenance of reserves therefor, and of other obligations pertaining to the securities, any project, or the facilities.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 777, § 95.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-95.

32-11-554. Covenants and other provisions.

Any resolution providing for the issuance of any bonds or other district securities under this article payable from pledged revenues, and any indenture or other instrument or proceedings pertaining thereto, may at the discretion of the board contain covenants or other provisions, notwithstanding such covenants and provisions may limit the exercise of powers conferred by this article, in order to secure the payment of such securities, in agreement with the holders of such securities, including without limitation covenants or other provisions as to any one or more of the following:

The pledged revenues and, in the case of general obligations, the taxes to be fixed, charged, or levied, and the collection, use, and disposition thereof, including but not limited to the foreclosure of liens for delinquencies, the discontinuance of services, facilities, or use of any properties or facilities, prohibition against free service, the collection of penalties and collection costs, and the use and disposition of any moneys of the district, derived or to be derived from any source designated in this article;

The acquisition, improvement, or equipment of all or any part of properties pertaining to any project or the facilities;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any securities or of operation and maintenance expenses of the facilities, or part thereof, and the source, custody, security, regulation, use, and disposition of any such reserves or funds, including but not limited to the powers and duties of any trustee with regard thereto;

A fair and reasonable payment by the district from its general fund or other available moneys to the account of any designated facilities for services rendered thereby to the district;

The payment of the cost of any project by delineating the purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of securities may be applied, and the custody, security, use, expenditure, application, and disposition thereof;

The temporary investment and any reinvestment of the proceeds of bonds, any other securities, any taxes, or any pledged revenues, or any combination thereof, in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.;

The pledge of and the creation of a lien upon pledged revenues or the proceeds of bonds or other district securities pending their application to defray the cost of the project, or both such revenues and proceeds of such securities, to secure the payment of bonds or other securities issued under this article;

The payment of the principal of and interest on any securities, and any prior redemption premiums due in connection therewith, and the sources and methods thereof, the rank or priority of any securities as to any lien or security for payment, or the acceleration of any maturity of any securities, or the issuance of other or additional securities payable from or constituting a charge against or lien upon any pledged revenues or other moneys pledged for the payment of securities and the creation of future liens and encumbrances thereagainst;

The use, regulation, inspection, management, operation, maintenance, or disposition, or any limitation or regulation of the use of all or any part of the facilities or any property of the district pertaining thereto;

The determination or definition of pledged revenues from the facilities or of operation and maintenance expenses of the facilities, the use and disposition of such revenues, and the manner of and limitations upon paying such expenses;

The creation of special funds and accounts pertaining to any pledged revenues or to the bonds or other securities issued under this article;

The insurance to be carried by the district or any person in interest and use and disposition of insurance moneys, the acquisition of completion, performance, surety, and fidelity bonds pertaining to any project or funds, or both, and the use and disposition of any proceeds of such bonds;

Books of account, the inspection and audit thereof, and other records pertaining to any project, the facilities, or pledged revenues;

The assumption or payment or discharge of any obligation, lien, or other claim relating to any part of any project, the facilities, or any securities having a lien on any part of any pledged revenues or other moneys of the district;

Limitations on the powers of the district to acquire or operate, or permit the acquisition or operation of, any structures, the facilities or properties of which may compete or tend to compete with the facilities;

The vesting in a corporate or other trustee such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the board may determine which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the holders of securities, and limiting or abrogating the right of such holders to appoint a trustee, or limiting the rights, duties, and powers of such trustee;

Events of default, rights, and liabilities arising therefrom, and the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by the district of any covenants, conditions, or obligations;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the securities or any portion, percentage, or amount of them may enforce any covenants or provisions made under this article or duties imposed by this article;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the securities or of a specified portion, percentage, or amount thereof, or any trustee therefor, shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any facilities or service, operate and maintain the same, prescribe fees, rates, and charges, and collect, receive, and apply all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the district itself might do;

A procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing securities, or any other contract with any holders of securities, including but not limited to an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated, and as to the proportion, percentage, or amount of securities the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

The terms and conditions upon which any or all of the securities shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived; and

All such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the securities, or in the discretion of the board tend to make the securities more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenant, act, or thing may not be enumerated in this article, it being the intention of this article to give the board power to do in the name and on behalf of the district all things in the issuance of district securities and for their security except as expressly limited in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 777, § 96.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-96.

L. 89:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1122, § 46, effective July 1.

32-11-555. Liens on pledged revenues.

Revenues pledged for the payment of any securities, as received by or otherwise credited to the district, shall immediately be subject to the lien of each such pledge without any physical delivery thereof, any filing, or further act.

The lien of each such pledge and the obligation to perform the contractual provisions made in the authorizing resolution or other instrument pertaining thereto has priority over any other obligations and liabilities of the district, except as may be otherwise provided in this article or in the resolution or other instrument, and subject to any prior pledges and liens theretofore created.

The lien of each such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all persons having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the district irrespective of whether such persons have notice thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 779, § 97.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-97.

32-11-556. Rights and powers of securities holders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue or series of district securities, or trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion, percentage, or number of such holders, and subject to any prior or superior rights of others, any holder of securities, or trustee therefor, shall have the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of securities similarly situated:

By mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the district, the board, and any other of the officers, agents, and employees of the district, to require and compel the district, the board, or any such officers, agents, or employees to perform and carry out their respective duties, obligations, or other commitments under this article and under their respective covenants and agreements with the holder of any security;

By action or suit in equity to require the district to account as if it is the trustee of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to have appointed a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any facilities and any pledged revenues for the payment of the securities, prescribe sufficient fees derived from the facilities, and collect, receive, and apply all pledged revenues or other moneys pledged for the payment of the securities in the same manner as the district itself might do in accordance with the obligations of the district; and

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holder of any securities and to bring suit thereupon.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 779, § 98.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-98.

32-11-557. Receivers.

If a resolution of the board authorizing or providing for the issuance of any securities of any series or any other proceedings pertaining thereto contains a provision authorized by section 32-11-554 (1)(s) and further provides in substance that any trustee appointed pursuant to section 32-11-554 (1)(p) shall have the powers provided therein, then such trustee, whether or not all of the bonds or other securities of such series have been declared due and payable, shall be entitled as of right to the appointment of a receiver of the facilities pertaining thereto.

Any receiver appointed as permitted by section 32-11-554 (1)(s) may enter upon and take possession of the facilities and any property pertaining thereto, and, subject to any pledge or contract with the holders of such securities, shall take possession of all moneys and other property derived from or applicable to the acquisition, operation, maintenance, or improvement of the facilities and proceed with such acquisition, operation, maintenance, or improvement which the board on the behalf of the district is under any obligation to do, and shall operate, maintain, equip, and improve the facilities, and fix, charge, collect, enforce, and receive the service charges and all revenues thereafter arising subject to any pledge thereof or contract with the holders of such securities relating thereto and perform the public duties and carry out the contracts and obligations of the district in the same manner as the board itself might do and under the direction of the court.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 780, § 99.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-99.

32-11-558. Issuance of interim debentures.

Notwithstanding any limitation or other provision in this article, whenever the issuance of general obligation bonds by a district for any project has been approved at an election held in accordance with this article, the district is authorized to borrow money without any other election in anticipation of the receipt of the proceeds of taxes, the proceeds of the bonds, the proceeds of pledged revenues, or any other moneys of the district, or any combination thereof, and to issue general obligation interim debentures to evidence the amount so borrowed.

The district also is authorized to borrow money without any election in anticipation of the proceeds of revenue bonds of the district and of its pledged revenues, or any combination thereof, but excluding the proceeds of any taxes, and to issue special obligation interim debentures to evidence the amount so borrowed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 780, § 100.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-100.

L. 70:

p. 301, § 126.

32-11-559. Limitations upon funding and refunding securities.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (2) to (4) of this section, nothing in this article authorizes the district to issue any district securities constituting a debt for the purpose of funding or refunding district securities constituting special obligations and not constituting an indebtedness.

Any special obligation securities of the district pertaining to any project may be funded or refunded by general obligation securities pertaining to the project only if the district is authorized to issue general obligation bonds pertaining to the project at an election held in the manner provided in section 32-11-533.

No general obligation securities pertaining to the project and creating an indebtedness, by funding or refunding special obligation securities or otherwise (in contradistinction to funding or refunding securities merely reevidencing an indebtedness formerly evidenced by the securities funded or refunded), shall be issued in a principal amount exceeding the debt limitation in section 32-11-534.

No bonds of the district shall be refunded by the issuance of its interim debentures, its notes, or its warrants. No interim debentures of the district shall be funded by the issuance of its notes or its warrants.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 780, § 101.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-101.

L. 70:

p. 302, § 127.

32-11-560. Interim debenture details.

Any interim debentures may mature at such time not exceeding a period of time equal to the estimated time needed to effect the purpose for which they are issued or for which the bonds are authorized to be issued, but not exceeding three years from the date or respective dates of the interim debentures, as the board may determine.

The proceeds of interim debentures shall be used to defray the cost of the project.

Any notes or warrants or both may be funded with the proceeds of interim debentures, as well as bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 32-11-558 to 32-11-563, interim debentures shall be issued as provided in this article for district securities in sections 32-11-502 to 32-11-557 and 32-11-803 to 32-11-808.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 781, § 102.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-102.

32-11-561. Payment of interim debentures.

Except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-559, the proceeds of taxes, pledged revenues, and other moneys, including without limitation proceeds of bonds to be issued or reissued after the issuance of interim debentures, and bonds issued for the purpose of securing the payment of interim debentures, or any combination thereof, may be pledged for the purpose of securing the payment of interim debentures. But the proceeds of taxes and the proceeds of bonds payable from taxes, or any combination thereof, shall not be used to pay any special obligation interim debentures, nor may their payment be secured by a pledge of any such general obligation bonds, except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-559.

Any bonds pledged as collateral security for the payment of any interim debentures shall mature at such time as the board may determine, except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-551.

No bonds pledged as collateral security shall be issued in an aggregate principal amount exceeding the aggregate principal amount of the interim debentures secured by a pledge of such bonds, nor shall they bear interest at any time which, with any interest accruing at the same time on the interim debentures so secured, exceeds seven percent each year.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 781, § 103.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-103.

32-11-562. Funding interim debentures.

No interim debentures issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 32-11-558 to 32-11-561 shall be extended or funded except by the issuance or reissuance of bonds in compliance with section 32-11-563.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 782, § 104.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-104.

32-11-563. Funding bonds.

For the purpose of funding any interim debentures, any bonds pledged as collateral security to secure the payment of such interim debentures, upon their surrender as pledged property, may be reissued without an election, and any bonds not previously issued but authorized to be issued at an election pursuant to section 32-11-533 for a purpose the same as or encompassing the purpose for which the interim debentures were issued, may be issued for such a funding.

Any such bonds shall mature at such time as the board may determine, except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-551.

Bonds for funding (including but not necessarily limited to any such reissued bonds) and bonds for any other purpose may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 32-11-559 to 32-11-563, any such funding bonds shall be issued as is provided in this article for other bonds.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 782, § 105.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-105.

32-11-564. Refunding bonds.

Subject to the provisions of section 32-11-559, any general obligation bonds or special obligation bonds of the district issued in accordance with the provisions of this article or any other law, and payable from any pledged revenues and any general obligation bonds of the district so issued but not payable from pledged revenues may be refunded on behalf of the district by the board, by the adoption of a resolution by the board, and by any trust indenture or other proceedings pertaining thereto, authorizing without any election the issuance of refunding bonds to refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of such outstanding bonds of any one or more or all outstanding issues:

For the acceleration, deceleration, or other modification of the payment of such obligations, including without limitation any capitalization of any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due for any period not exceeding three years from the date of the refunding bonds, unless the capitalization of interest on bonds constituting an indebtedness increases the district debt in excess of the district's debt limitation in section 32-11-534; or

For the purpose of reducing interest costs or effecting other economies; or

For the purpose of modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations pertaining to the issuance of additional bonds, otherwise concerning the outstanding bonds, or to any facilities pertaining thereto; or

For any combination of such purposes.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 782, § 106.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-106.

32-11-565. Method of issuing refunding bonds.

Subject to the provisions of sections 32-11-525 and 32-11-526, any such bonds issued for refunding purposes may either be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds being refunded or may be publicly or privately sold.

The refunding bonds, or any part thereof, except as limited by section 32-11-568 (2), may be exchanged by the district for securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., which have been made available for escrow investment by any purchaser of refunding bonds, upon terms of exchange mutually agreed upon, and any such securities so received by the district shall be placed in escrow as provided in sections 32-11-567 and 32-11-568.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 782, § 107.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-107.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1122, § 47, effective July 1.

32-11-566. Conditions for refunding.

No such bonds may be refunded under this article unless they have been outstanding for at least one year from the date or respective dates of their delivery, and unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment, or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds. Provision shall be made for paying the securities within such period of time.

No maturity of any bond refunded may be extended over fifteen years, or beyond one year next following the date of the last outstanding maturity, whichever limitation is later. The rate of interest on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the board.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded, except to the extent any interest on the bonds refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of the refunding bonds. Principal may also then be increased to that extent. In no event, however, in the case of any bonds constituting a debt, shall the principal of the bonds be increased to any amount in excess of the debt limitation in section 32-11-534.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the bonds being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for their payment.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 783, § 108.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-108.

L. 70:

p. 302, § 128.

32-11-567. Disposition of refunding bond proceeds.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the proceeds of such refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be refunded, or be placed in escrow or trust in any trust bank within or without or both within and without this state to be applied to the payment of the refunded bonds or the refunding bonds, or both, upon their presentation therefor to the extent, in such priority, and otherwise in the manner which the board may determine.

The incidental costs of refunding bonds may be paid by the purchaser of the refunding bonds or be defrayed from any general fund (subject to appropriations therefor as otherwise provided by law) or other available revenues of the district under the control of the board or from the proceeds of the refunding bonds, or from the interest or other yield derived from the investment of any refunding bond proceeds or other moneys in escrow or trust, or from any other sources legally available therefor, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

Any accrued interest and any premium pertaining to a sale of refunding bonds may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon or the principal thereof, or to both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, or may be used to refund bonds by deposit in escrow, trust, or otherwise, or may be used to defray any incidental costs pertaining to the refunding, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 783, § 109.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-109.

32-11-568. Administration of escrow or trust.

No such escrow or trust shall necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding bonds but may include other moneys available for its purpose.

Any proceeds in escrow or trust, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Any trust bank accounting for federal securities and other securities issued by the federal government in such escrow or trust may place them for safekeeping wholly or in part in any trust bank within or without or both within and without this state.

Any trust bank shall continuously secure any moneys placed in escrow or trust and not so invested or reinvested in federal securities and other securities issued by the federal government by a pledge in any trust bank within or without or both within and without the state of federal securities in an amount at all times at least equal to the total uninvested amount of such moneys accounted for in such escrow or trust.

Such proceeds and investments in escrow or trust, together with any interest or other gain to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times at least sufficient to pay principal, interest, any prior redemption premiums due, and any charges of the escrow agent or trustee, and any other incidental expenses payable therefrom, except to the extent provision may have been previously otherwise made therefor, as such obligations become due at their respective maturities or due at designated prior redemption dates in connection with which the board has exercised or is obligated to exercise a prior redemption option on behalf of the district.

The computations made in determining such sufficiency shall be verified by a certified public accountant licensed to practice in this state or in any other state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 783, § 110.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-110.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1122, § 48, effective July 1.

32-11-569. Security for payment of refunding bonds.

Refunding bonds may be made payable from any taxes or pledged revenues, or both taxes and such revenues, which might be legally pledged for the payment of the bonds being refunded at the time of the refunding or at the time of the issuance of the bonds being refunded, as the board may determine, notwithstanding the taxes, or the revenue sources, or the pledge of such revenues, or any combination thereof, for the payment of the outstanding bonds refunded is thereby modified, subject to the provisions of section 32-11-559.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 784, § 111.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-111.

32-11-570. Combination of bond purposes.

Bonds for refunding and bonds for any other purpose authorized by this article or by any other law may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more by the district in accordance with the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 784, § 112.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-112.

32-11-571. Applicability of other statutory provisions.

Except as expressly provided or necessarily implied in sections 32-11-564 to 32-11-570, the relevant provisions elsewhere in this article pertaining generally to the issuance of bonds to defray the cost of any project shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding bonds, including their terms and security, the covenants and other provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, or other instrument or proceedings pertaining thereto, and other aspects of the bonds.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 784, § 113.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-113.